Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201581-3427
Technical submissions, defined.

Technical submissions means designs, drawings, specifications, studies, and other technical reports that constitute, or may be prepared in conjunction with, a project.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 27;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 24.
August 30, 2015